Idaho, session 2026, H0719.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6610D, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6610D. FOREIGN CONTRIBUTIONS, FOREIGN INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURES,
AND FOREIGN ELECTIONEERING COMMUNICATIONS PROHIBITED -- OUT-OF-STATE CON-
TRIBUTIONS AND INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURES PROHIBITED. (1) A foreign national
shall not make a contribution, directly or indirectly, to any candidate,
political committee, or measure or make electioneering communications or
independent expenditures. An out-of-state person shall not make a contri-
bution, directly or indirectly, to any candidate, political committee, or
measure or make independent expenditures.
(2) As used in this section, "foreign national":
(a) "Foreign national" means:
(a) (i) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and
is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence;
(b) (ii) A government or subdivision of a foreign country;
(c) (iii) A foreign political party; or
(d) (iv) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corpora-
tion, organization, union, or other combination of persons, that
is organized under the laws of or has its principal place of busi-
ness in a foreign country.
(b) "Legal resident of Idaho" means an individual who is a citizen of
the United States and who has resided in Idaho for at least thirty (30)
days.
(c) "Out-of-state person" means:
(i) An individual who is not a legal resident of Idaho; or
(ii) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation,
organization, union, or other combination of persons, that is or-
ganized under the laws of or has its principal place of business in
another state and does not maintain a physical office in the state
of Idaho.
(3) A violation of the provisions of this section shall be prosecuted
and punished as provided in section 67-6625(2) through (5), Idaho Code. Pro-
vided, however, any person who knowingly and willfully violates the provi-
sions of this section is guilty of a felony when:
(a) The aggregate amount of contributions, independent expenditures,
or cost of electioneering communications made in violation of this sec-


tion exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000) in a consecutive twelve (12)
month period; or
(b) The person pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a knowing and will-
ful violation of the provisions of this section for a second time within
ten (10) years, notwithstanding the form of the judgment or withheld
judgment.
(4) If any provision of this section or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the section or the applica-
tion of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.